District of Columbia statutes.
48-706

Conditional license.

The Mayor may issue a conditional license to a person if the person does not meet all of the requirements of this chapter, the rules issued pursuant to this chapter, or any applicable federal law, provided the failure to meet the requirements does not endanger the health, safety, or welfare of the community, and the Mayor mandates that the requirements be met by a specific date.

June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-137, § 7, 37 DCR 2631
1981 Ed., § 33-1006.